Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1112
Order filed prior to July 19, 1996; applicability.

A domestic relations order filed with the Public Employees Retirement Board prior to July 19, 1996, shall be deemed a qualified domestic relations order under the Spousal Pension Rights Act if the statewide public retirement system is making payments under the order on July 19, 1996, and such order conforms to section 414(p)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 12.